morphophonology/foma/lutmorph.foma
read lexc vstems.lexc
define VerbStems;
read lexc nstems.lexc
define NounStems;

read lexc lsuff.lexc
define LSuff;

# currently implements type I & II redup
# and some type III
source redup.foma

# exceptions to reduplication
# currently only used on nouns
read lexc except.lexc
define Except;

#nominalizers
read lexc nmlz.lexc
define Nmlz;

#proclitics
read lexc proclit.lexc
define ProClit;

#enclitics
read lexc enclit.lexc
define EnClit;

# prefix1 
read lexc pcpref1.lexc
define PCpref1;

define VPostpref1 (PCpref1) PostRedV (LSuff);
define NPostpref1 (PCpref1) [ Except .P. PostRedN ] (LSuff);


# prefix2, aspect
# Aspect only occurs on verbs
# so we have to do verbalization of nouns via "prop-" before aspect
read lexc aspectpref.lexc
define AspectPref;

read lexc prop.lexc
define PropPref;

define VPostAspect (AspectPref) [VPostpref1|[PropPref NPostpref1]];


# suffix1 (inchoative -il)
read lexc pcsuff1.lexc
define PCsuff1;

define NPostsuff1 NPostpref1   (PCsuff1);
define VPostsuff1 VPostAspect (PCsuff1);


# suff2 (middle, ...)
read lexc pcsuff2.lexc
define PCsuff2;

define NPostsuff2 NPostsuff1 (PCsuff2);
define VPostsuff2 VPostsuff1 (PCsuff2);


#suff3 (external caus, dim-cntrl caus)
# only verbs (I think?!)
read lexc causesuff1.lexc
define Causesuff1;

define VPostCausesuff1 VPostsuff2 (Causesuff1);


#suff4 (dat, map, ss)
read lexc pcsuff4.lexc
define PCsuff4;

define VPostsuff4 VPostCausesuff1 (PCsuff4);
define NPostsuff4 NPostsuff2 (PCsuff4);


#suff5 (ics, altv, csmd)
read lexc pcsuff5.lexc
define PCsuff5;

define VPostsuff5 VPostsuff4 (PCsuff5);
define NPostsuff5 NPostsuff4 (PCsuff5);


#suff6 (pass and obj markers)
# only verbs
read lexc pcsuff6.lexc
define PCsuff6;

#relsuff, attaches to verbs and adverbs
read lexc relsuff.lexc
define RelSuff;

define VPostsuff6 VPostsuff5 (PCsuff6) (RelSuff);

# possesive suffs (only nouns)
# and prefs (only nouns)
read lexc posuff.lexc
define poSuff;

read lexc popref.lexc
define poPref;

define NPostsuff6 (poPref) NPostsuff5 (poSuff);

# constant items (non-inflecting)
# even these guys can host lexical suffixes though!
read lexc const.lexc
define pConst;
define Const pConst (LSuff);


#phon classes
#
#obstruents
define O {b̓}|{b}|{d}|{dᶻ}|{ǰ}|{g}|{gʷ}|{p}|{t}|{c}|{č}|{k}|{q}|{ʔ}|{kʷ}|{qʷ}|{p̓}|{t̕}|{c̓}|{č̓}|{k̓}|{q̓}|{k̓ʷ}|{q̓ʷ}|s|š|{x}|{x̌}|{h}|{xʷ}|{x̌ʷ}|{m}|{n}|{m̓}|{n̓};

# phon rules here:

## various reductions at morpheme boundaries


###########################################
# can these be generalized?

# do they all occur at word boundaries?
# this one has to:  dəxʷ=xʷiʔ -> dəxʷiʔ
define XWSync x ʷ -> 0 || _ [ "-" | "=" ] ( "@D.NMLZ_V.ON@" ) (√) x ʷ;
define ɬSync ɬ -> 0 || _ [ "-" | "=" ] ( "@D.NMLZ_V.ON@" ) (√) ɬ ;

# this one too: s=šac̓=s -> šac̓s
define SSync s-> 0 || _ [ "-" | "=" ] (√) [ s | š ];

# also optional in suffixing: təš=s -> təš
# and after "c" ( qʷic=s=axʷ <-> qʷicəxʷ ) 
define OptSSync s (->) 0 || [ s | š | c ] ( "@D.SCLIT.ON@" "@P.SCLIT.ON@" "@R.NMLZ_V.ON@") [ "-" | "=" ] _ ;

define TSync t-> 0 || t "@P.S_OBJ_MARKS.ON@" "-" _  ;

# suffixes
define BSync b -> 0 || _ "-" b ;
define DSync d -> 0 ||_ "-" d ;
define CSync c -> 0 || _ "@D.IL.ON@" "-" c ;

define ConSync XWSync .o. ɬSync .o. SSync
                                .o. OptSSync 
                                .o. TSync .o. BSync .o. DSync .o. CSync;
#########################################################

# contraction of specific prefix sequenences
define ʔəbs ʔ a s "-" b ə s -> ʔ ə b s || _ "-";


# this rule (so far) seems to apply to "hay", but not "huy"
# keep an eye on this one
define StatH   h -> 0 || a s "-" √  _ a y;

# hay and huy (and others?)
define SHREDUCE h -> 0 || d ( ə ) x ʷ ( s )  ["-"|"="] √ _ ;

# this one has to apply after vowel reduction
# generally occurs in ʔas-dxʷ context but
# uʔREM may have already applied, removing the ʔ
define SDREDUCE s "-" d -> 0 || [ a | ə ] _ x ʷ ;

# šuɬ loses final ɬ before -d, not sure how widspread this is so
# constraining to just this form for now

define LDREDUCE ɬ -> 0 ||  š u _ "-" d;

# interesting that u=ʔ gets removed before a (before v reduction, leaving a)
# but ə=ʔ gets removed after v reduction (leaving ə/u)
# remove the initial glot stop of a stative marker before a clitic boundary
define ʔREM ʔ -> 0 || "=" _ [ a s | u ] "-"; 
define UREM u -> 0 || _ "=" V ;
define SCHWADEL ə -> 0 || _ ("=") V ;

define sə s %= l ə %= -> s ə %= ;

# final l is deleted when -s attaches
define LS2S l -> 0 || i _ "@R.IL.ON@" "-" s ;

define VREDUCE1 a -> ə ||  ʔ _ s "-" ;

# VREDUCE2 is optional
define VREDUCE2 a (->) ə ||  = _  [ x ʷ | s ],
                            %- _  b ;


# insert h between vowels at morpheme boundary
# ignore parans/length on optional vowel
define HEPEN [..] -> h || V ( %) | ˑ ) _ ( "@P.IL.ON@" ) [ "-" | "=" ] V;

## allow any vowel in a short word 
## want to allow any vowl but never more than one vowel
define VLEN [..] (->) ˑ || V _ .o. $?ˑ;

### problem: ʔa+t -> ʔahəb
###   both the posited rules:
###     1) h insertion between vowels
###     2) schwa insertion between obstruents
###   need to apply but no ordering works!
###  making an exception rule
define ʔAH [..] -> h || ʔ a _ ( "@P.S_OBJ_MARKS.ON@" ) "-" d ;

## this changes tu-, du- to txʷ, dxʷ word finally
## should also apply in front of lsuffs!
define FinalHard1 u -> x ʷ || "-" [ d | t ] _  [ .#. | • ];
define FinalHard2 t -> d || "-" _ [ .#. | • ];

# insert schwa beteen O and middle voice, or O and -d form of ICS
# note, this cannot apply to -bi! cf. ʔušəbid , *ʔušəbəbid
#
# needs to apply after we do txʷ -> tu
define SchwaIns  [..] -> ə || O ( "@P.S_OBJ_MARKS.ON@" ) "-" _ d .#. ,
                              O "-" _ b [ "-" | .#. ];


#####################################################################
## -c allomorph of applicative causes v gemination for v final stems
## and final consonant deletion for a small set of stems which feeds 
## the gemination

# idiosyncratic C removal preceeding v->vv || _ -c
define idio  š u ɬ -> š u, 
             c u t -> c u, 
             q ʷ i ʔ a d ->  q ʷ i ʔ a || _ "@D.IL.ON@" ;
# double vowel on V final stems when -c attaches (pcsuff5)
define agem a -> a a // √ ~$%- _ ( %) ) "@D.IL.ON@" ;
define əgem ə -> a a // √ ~$%- _ ( %) ) "@D.IL.ON@" ;
define igem i -> i i // √ ~$%- _ ( %) ) "@D.IL.ON@" ;
define ugem u -> u u // √ ~$%- _ ( %) ) "@D.IL.ON@" ;

# summarize
define VVC idio .o. agem .o. əgem .o. igem .o. ugem; 
#####################################################################



define FVREM %( V %) (->) 0 ;
define TSCombine "t" ( "@R.S_OBJ_MARKS@" ) "-" "s" -> c || _  [ u t | .#. ] ; 
define RemoveMarkers "="|"-"|"("|")"|√ -> 0;


define Baseword NPostsuff6| (Nmlz) VPostsuff6;
define IWord Baseword .o. StatH 
                      .o. FinalHard1 
                      .o. FinalHard2 
                      .o. ʔAH
                      .o. SchwaIns
                      .o. FVREM
                      .o. TSCombine
                      .o. LS2S 
                      .o. SHREDUCE
                      .o. LDREDUCE
                      .o. VVC 
                      .o. ʔəbs;

# there's a suffix that doesn't affect word-final phonology,
# but shouldn't be in the cyclically applying enclitics
#
# the desiderative -ab:-əb
# has a relation to prefix dxʷ(s), but currently nothing implemented 
# to connected them

define DSD [ {-ab} ];
define Word [IWord|Const] (DSD);

regex ProClit* Word EnClit*  .o. ʔREM
                             .o. UREM
                             .o. SCHWADEL
                             .o. VREDUCE1
                             .o. VREDUCE2
                             .o. SDREDUCE
                             .o. HEPEN
                             .o. ConSync
                             .o. VLEN
                             .o. sə
                             .o. RemoveMarkers ;
